Utah statutes.
76-8-1402.   Disruption of activities in or near school building -- Failure
to leave -- Reentry -- Penalties.
(1)  In the absence of a local ordinance or other controlling law governing
the conduct described in this Subsection (1), a person is guilty of an offense
under Subsection (2) who, while on a street, sidewalk, or public way adjacent
to any school building or ground:
(a)  by his or her presence or acts, materially disrupts the peaceful conduct
of school activities; and
(b)  remains upon the place under Subsection (1)(a) after being asked to leave
by the chief administrator of that school.
(2) (a)  A violation of Subsection (1) is subject to the penalties under
Subsection (2)(b) unless the violation constitutes another offense subject to
a greater penalty.
(b) (i)  The first and second violation of Subsection (1) are class B
misdemeanors.
(ii)  A third and any subsequent violations of Subsection (1) are class A
misdemeanors.
